Washington statutes.
RCW 4.72.020

Motion to vacate—Time limitation.

The proceedings to vacate or modify a judgment or order for mistakes or omissions of the clerk, or irregularity in obtaining the judgment or order, shall be by motion served on the adverse party or on his or her attorney in the action, and within one year.

[ 2011 c 336 s 119; 1891 c 27 s 1; Code 1881 s 438; 1877 p 97 s 440; 1875 p 21 s 3; RRS s 466.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 60(b).